Nevada, session 83, SB492.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the State Department of Agriculture the sum of $38,761 for
the Veterinary Medical Services budget account for the purchase of
software.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the State Department of Agriculture the sum of $51,485 for
the Veterinary Medical Services budget account for the replacement
of equipment.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the State Department of Agriculture the sum of $212,488
for the Administrative Services budget account for the replacement
of equipment.
Sec. 4. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
section 1, 2 or 3 of this act must not be committed for expenditure
after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made
or any entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)